Utah statutes.
79-3-303.   Responsibilities of board.
The board has the following responsibilities:
(1)  establish and review policies, programs, and priorities;
(2)  review and recommend budgets;
(3)  assess the needs of the community with regard to development and use of
geologic resources;
(4)  keep the director advised concerning survey policies; and
(5)  enact rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, the Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, that are necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.
